Illinois, session 104th, HB3000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.81 and 34-18.75 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.81)7    Sec. 10-20.81. Identification cards; suicide prevention 8information.9    (a) Each school district that serves pupils in any of 10grades 6 through 12 and that issues an identification card to 11pupils in any of grades 6 through 12 shall provide contact 12information for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 13(988), the Crisis Text Line, and the Safe2Help Illinois 14helpline on the identification card. The contact information 15shall identify each helpline that may be contacted through 16text messaging. The contact information shall be included in 17the school's student handbook and also the student planner if 18a student planner is custom printed by the school for 19distribution to pupils in any of grades 6 through 12.20    (b) Each school district that serves pupils in any of 21grades 6 through 12 and that issues an identification card to 22school employees serving any of grades 6 through 12 shall 23provide on the identification card the same contact   HB3000 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09761 LNS 19827 b1information that is required to be provided on a pupil's 2identification card under subsection (a). 3(Source: P.A. 102-416, eff. 7-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 4103-143, eff. 7-1-23.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.75)6    Sec. 34-18.75. Identification cards; suicide prevention 7information.8    (a) If the school district issues an identification card 9to pupils in any of grades 6 through 12, the district shall 10provide contact information for the National Suicide 11Prevention Lifeline (988), the Crisis Text Line, and the 12Safe2Help Illinois helpline on the identification card. The 13contact information shall identify each helpline that may be 14contacted through text messaging. The contact information 15shall be included in the school's student handbook and also 16the student planner if a student planner is custom printed by 17the school for distribution to pupils in any of grades 6 18through 12.19    (b) If the school district issues an identification card 20to school employees serving any of grades 6 through 12, the 21district shall provide on the identification card the same 22contact information that is required to be provided on a 23pupil's identification card under subsection (a). 24(Source: P.A. 102-416, eff. 7-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 25103-143, eff. 7-1-23.)